California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(c) The district is not required to make service available to the residential occupants unless each residential occupant agrees to the terms and conditions of service, and meets the requirements of the district’s rules. However, if one or more of the residential occupants are willing
 and able to assume responsibility for the subsequent charges to the account to the satisfaction of the district, or if there is a physical means, legally available to the district, of selectively terminating service to those residential occupants who have not met the requirements of the district’s rules, the district shall make service available to the residential occupants who have met those requirements.

(d) If prior service for a period of time is a condition for establishing credit with the district, residence and proof of prompt payment of rent or other credit obligation acceptable to the district for that period of time is a satisfactory equivalent.

(e) Any residential occupant who becomes a customer of the district pursuant to this section whose periodic payments, such as rental payments, include charges for residential light, heat, water, or power, where these charges are
 not separately stated, may deduct from the periodic payment each payment period all reasonable charges paid to the district for those services during the preceding payment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 560, Sec. 8.   (SB 120)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

16481.1.

(a) If a district furnishes residential light, heat, water, or power to residential occupants through a master meter in a multiunit residential structure, mobilehome park, or permanent residential structure in a labor camp, as defined in Section 17008 of the Health and Safety Code, and the owner, manager, or operator of the structure or park is listed by the district as the customer of record, the district
 shall make every good faith effort to inform the residential occupants, by means of a written notice posted on the door of each residential unit at least 15 days prior to termination, when the account is in arrears, that service will be terminated on a date specified in the notice. If it is not reasonable or practicable to post the notice on the door of each residential unit, the district shall post two copies of the notice in each common area and at each point of access to the structure or structures. The notice shall further inform the residential occupants that they have the right to become customers, to whom the service will be billed, of the district without being required to pay the amount due on the delinquent account. The notice also shall specify, in plain language, what the residential occupants are required to do in order to prevent the termination or reestablish service; the estimated monthly cost of service; the title, address, and telephone number of a representative of the district who can
 assist the residential occupants in continuing service; and the address and telephone number of a legal services project, as defined in Section 6213 of the Business and Professions Code, which has been recommended by the local county bar association. The notice shall be in English and in the languages listed in Section 1632 of the Civil Code.

(b) The district is not required to make service available to the residential occupants unless each residential occupant or a representative of the residential occupants agrees to the terms and conditions of service, and meets the requirements of law and the district’s rules. However, if one or more of the residential occupants or the representative of the residential occupants are willing and able to assume responsibility for subsequent charges to the account to the satisfaction of the district, or if there is a physical means, legally available to the district, of selectively terminating service to those
 residential occupants who have not met the requirements of the district’s rules or for whom the representative of the residential occupants is not responsible, the district shall make service available to the residential occupants who have met those requirements or on whose behalf those requirements have been met.

(c) If prior service for a period of time or other demonstration of credit worthiness is a condition for establishing credit with the district, residence and proof of prompt payment of rent or other credit obligation during that period of time acceptable to the district is a satisfactory equivalent.

(d) Any residential occupant who becomes a customer of the district pursuant to this section whose periodic payments, such as rental payments, include charges for residential light, heat, water, or power, where these charges are not separately stated, may deduct from the
 periodic payment each payment period all reasonable charges paid to the district for those services during the preceding payment period.

(e) If a district furnishes residential service subject to subdivision (a), the district may not terminate that service in any of the following situations:

(1) During the pendency of an investigation by the district of a customer dispute or complaint.

(2) If the customer has been granted an extension of the period for payment of a bill.

(3) For an indebtedness owed by the customer to any other public agency or when the obligation represented by the delinquent account or other indebtedness was incurred with any public agency other than the district.

(4) If
 a delinquent account relates to another property owned, managed, or operated by the customer.

(5) If a public health or building officer certifies that termination would result in a significant threat to the health or safety of the residential occupants or the public.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to any other remedy provided by law, if the owner, operator, or manager, by any act or omission, directs, permits, or fails to prevent a termination of service while any residential unit is occupied, the residential occupant or the representative of the residential occupants may commence an action for the recovery of all of the following:

(1) Reasonable costs and expenses incurred by the residential occupant or the representative of the residential occupants related to restoration of
 service.

(2) Actual damages related to the termination of service.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees of the residential occupants, the representative of the residential occupants, or each of them, incurred in the enforcement of this section, including, but not limited to, enforcement of a lien.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to any other remedy provided by law, if the owner, manager, or operator, by any act or omission, directs, permits, or fails to prevent a termination of service while any residential unit receiving that service is occupied, the corporation may commence an action for the recovery of all of the following:

(1) Delinquent charges accruing prior to the expiration of the notice prescribed by subdivision
 (a).

(2) Reasonable costs incurred by the corporation related to the restoration of service.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees of the corporation incurred in the enforcement of this section or in the collection of delinquent charges, including, but not limited to, enforcement of a lien.

If the court finds that the owner, manager, or operator has paid the amount in arrears prior to termination, the court shall allow no recovery of any charges, costs, damages, expenses, or fees under this subdivision from the owner, manager, or operator.

An abstract of any money judgment entered pursuant to subdivision (f) or (g) shall be recorded pursuant to Section 697.310 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) No termination of service subject to this
 section may be effected without compliance with this section, and any service wrongfully terminated shall be restored without charge to the residential occupants or customer for the restoration of the service. In the event of a wrongful termination by the district, the district shall, in addition, be liable to the residential occupants or customer for actual damages resulting from the termination and for the costs of enforcement of this section, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney’s fees, if the residential occupants or the representative of the residential occupants make a good faith effort to have the service continued without interruption.

(i) The district shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this section and shall liberally construe this section to accomplish its purpose of ensuring that service to the residential occupants is not terminated due to nonpayment by the customer unless the district has made
 every reasonable effort to continue service to the residential occupants. The rules and regulations shall include, but are not limited to, guidelines for assistance to actual users in the enforcement of this section and requirements for the notice prescribed by subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, clear wording, large and boldface type, and comprehensive instructions to ensure full notice to the actual users.

(j) Nothing in this section broadens or restricts any authority of a local agency that existed prior to January 1, 1989, to adopt an ordinance protecting a residential occupant from the involuntary termination of residential public utility service.

(k) This section preempts any statute or ordinance permitting punitive damages against any owner, manager, or operator on account of an involuntary termination of public utility service or permitting the recovery of
 costs associated with the formation, maintenance, and termination of a tenant’s association.

(l) For purposes of this section, “representative of the residential occupants” does not include a tenants’ association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 560, Sec. 9.   (SB 120)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

16481.6.

The decision of a district to require a new residential applicant to deposit a sum of money with the district prior to establishing an account and furnishing service shall be based solely upon the credit worthiness of the applicant as determined by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1066, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

16482.

(a) No district furnishing its inhabitants with light, water, power, heat, or means for the disposition of garbage, sewage, or refuse matter may terminate residential service for nonpayment of a delinquent account unless the district first gives notice of the delinquency and impending termination, as provided in Section 16482.1.

(b) No district shall terminate residential service for nonpayment in any of the following situations:

(1) During the pendency of an investigation by the district of a customer
 dispute or complaint.

(2) When a customer has been granted an extension of the period for payment of a bill.

(3) On the certification of a licensed physician and surgeon that to do so will be life threatening to the customer and the customer is financially unable to pay for service within the normal payment period and is willing to enter into an amortization agreement with the district pursuant to subdivision (e) with respect to all charges that the customer is unable to pay prior to delinquency.

(c) Any residential customer who has initiated a complaint or requested an investigation within five days of receiving the contested bill, or who has, within 13 days of mailing of the notice required by subdivision (a), made a request for extension of the payment period of a bill asserted to be beyond the means of the
 customer to pay in full during the normal period for payment, shall be given an opportunity for review of the complaint, investigation, or request by a review manager of the district. The review shall include consideration of whether the customer shall be permitted to amortize the unpaid balance of the account over a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 12 months. No termination of service shall be effected for any customer complying with an amortization agreement if the customer also keeps the account current as charges accrue in each subsequent billing period.

(d) Any customer whose complaint or request for an investigation pursuant to subdivision (c) has resulted in an adverse determination by the district may appeal the determination to the board. Any subsequent appeal of the dispute or complaint to the board is not subject to this section.

(e) Any customer meeting the
 requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall, upon request, be permitted to amortize, over a period not to exceed 12 months, the unpaid balance of any bill asserted to be beyond the means of the customer to pay within the normal period for payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 888, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

16482.1.

(a) A district furnishing light, heat, water, or power, or means for the disposition of garbage, sewage, or refuse matter, shall not terminate residential service on account of nonpayment of a delinquent account unless the district first gives notice of the delinquency and impending termination, at least 10 days prior to the proposed termination, by means of a notice mailed, postage prepaid, to the customer to whom the service is billed, not earlier than 19 days from the date of mailing the district’s bill for services, and the 10-day period shall not commence until five days after the mailing of the notice.

(b) Every district shall make a reasonable, good faith effort to contact an adult person residing at the premises of
 the customer by telephone or personal contact, at least 48 hours prior to any termination of service, except that, whenever telephone or personal contact cannot be accomplished, the district shall give, by mail, in person, or by posting in a conspicuous location at the premises, a notice of termination of service, at least 48 hours prior to termination.

(c) Every district shall make available to its residential customers who are 65 years of age or older, or who are dependent adults as defined in Section 15610.23 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a third-party notification service, whereby the district will attempt to notify a person designated by the customer to receive notification when the customer’s account is past due and subject to termination. The notification shall include information on what is required to prevent termination of service. The residential customer shall make a request for third-party notification on a form provided by
 the district, and shall include the written consent of the designated third party. The third-party notification does not obligate the third party to pay the overdue charges, nor shall it prevent or delay termination of service.

(d) Every notice of termination of service pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name and address of the customer whose account is delinquent.

(2) The amount of the delinquency.

(3) The date by which payment or arrangements for payment is required in order to avoid termination.

(4) The procedure by which the customer may initiate a complaint or request an investigation concerning service or charges, except that, if the
 bill for service contains a description of that procedure, the notice pursuant to subdivision (a) is not required to contain that information.

(5) The procedure by which the customer may request amortization of the unpaid charges.

(6) The procedure for the customer to obtain information on the availability of financial assistance, including private, local, state, or federal sources, if applicable.

(7) The telephone number of a representative of the district who can provide additional information or institute arrangements for payment.

Every notice of termination of service pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include the items of information in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (6), and (7).

All written notices shall be in a clear and legible
 format.

(e) If a residential customer fails to comply with an amortization agreement, the district shall not terminate service without giving notice to the customer at least 48 hours prior to termination of the conditions the customer is required to meet to avoid termination, but this notice does not entitle the customer to further investigation by the district.

(f) A termination of service shall not be effected without compliance with this section. Any service wrongfully terminated shall be restored without charge for the restoration of the service, and a notation thereof shall be mailed to the customer the customer’s billing address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 252.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

16483.

No electrical, gas, heat, or water public utility district shall, by reason of delinquency in payment for any electric, gas, heat, or water services, cause cessation of any such services on any Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or at any time during which the business offices of the district are not open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------

16485.

(a) A public utility district which acquires, constructs, owns, operates, controls or uses works for supplying its inhabitants with electricity, may fix and collect charges in the manner provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 16461) and Article 8 (commencing with Section 16641), Chapter 4, Division 7 of the Public Utilities Code, for an electricity standby or immediate availability charge on all lands within its boundaries to which electricity is made available for any purpose by the district, whether the electricity is actually used or not.

(b) The board of directors of the districts
 which fixes such a charge may exempt certain classes of users from such a charge and may establish schedules varying the charges in different months and in different localities within a public utility district depending upon factors such as the uses to which the electricity is put, the cost of transmitting the electricity to the user, the degree of availability or quantity of use of such electricity. The board may not, however, fix an annual charge in excess of twenty dollars ($20) per acre or in excess of ten dollars ($10) for a parcel of less than one acre.

(c) Any funds derived from the charges levied pursuant to this section may be used by the district for all purposes which a public utility district is authorized to expend funds insofar as these purposes relate to the acquisition, construction, operation, control, or use of works for supplying its inhabitants with electricity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 467.)
-------------------------------------------

16486.

(a) In addition to all other powers, excepting telephone service, authorized by this division, the Kirkwood Meadows Public Utility District may acquire, construct, own, and operate public parking facilities and cable television facilities and may provide snow removal and road maintenance services for all roads open to the public, including, but not limited to, public roads and roads offered for dedication but not accepted, within the district. Prior to providing any snow removal or road maintenance services, the district shall obtain the
 consent of any public agency owning the roads. Notwithstanding Section 16467, the facilities and services provided in this subdivision need not be operated on a self-sustaining, revenue-producing basis. Revenue to defray the cost of the facilities and services may be raised in any manner authorized by this division.

(b) The Kirkwood Meadows Public Utility District may exercise all of the powers of a mosquito abatement district or vector control district, as set forth in the Mosquito Abatement and Vector Control District Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 3 of the Health and Safety Code), within the service area of the Kirkwood Meadows Public Utility District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

16487.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Kirkwood Meadows Public Utility District may issue bonds and incur indebtedness pursuant to the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code),
 or the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, owning, and operating any revenue-producing improvement, building, system, plant, works, facilities, undertaking, or other enterprise used for or useful for the generation, production, transmission, or distribution of electricity or gas for light, heat, or power for public or private uses.

If the Kirkwood Meadows Public Utility District is not incorporated on or before March 1, 1986, this section is repealed on that date.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 852) by Stats. 1983, Ch. 733, Sec. 4.   Note: This section was not repealed by its own provisions because the conditions failed.)
-------------------------------------------

16488.

Every district shall comply with Section 8029.5.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 16487 (as added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 549) by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

16489.

The June Lake Public Utility District may exercise all of the powers of a mosquito abatement district or vector control district, as set forth in the Mosquito Abatement and Vector Control District Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 3 of the Health and Safety Code), within the service area of the June Lake Public Utility District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Purchase of Supplies and Advertising [16531. - 16531.]

16531.

Except as otherwise provided, the board shall determine annually what goods, merchandise, stores, subsistence, materials, and other supplies will be needed by the district for the ensuing year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Indebtedness and Financing [16571. - 16580.]

16571.

A district may borrow money and incur or assume indebtedness, and issue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16572.

A district may refund or retire any of its existing or assumed indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16573.

No district shall incur any funded indebtedness which in the aggregate exceeds 20 percent of the assessed valuation of all real and personal property situated within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16574.

The board of directors or other officers of the district may not incur any debt or liability, either by issuing bonds or otherwise, in excess of the express provisions of this division. Any debt or liability incurred in excess of those express provisions is absolutely void, excepting that the debt limitations may be exceeded where the district finances waterworks or sewage disposal facilities by means of a revenue bond issue, or by means of a general obligation bond issue, or by means provided by Section 16580 and makes provision to pledge, as additional security for the general obligation or indebtedness, all or any part of revenues received from the facilities over a period not to exceed 40 years, in which event the limitation of indebtedness set forth in Section 16573 of this code may not be applicable to the bonds or indebtedness so secured or so additionally secured by the revenue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 606, Sec. 6.   Effective October 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16575.

A district may issue bonds for the purpose of acquiring or constructing any waterworks necessary or proper for carrying out the objects and purposes of the district, in like manner as other bonds are authorized to be issued under this division, and may pledge the revenue, income, receipts, and profits from the operation of the waterworks to the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds. A district may, if it so elects, declare the payment thereof shall be made solely from the revenue, income, receipts, and profits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16576.

Notwithstanding any provision of this division limiting the amount of indebtedness which may be incurred by it, in order to repair and replace structures and equipment impaired or destroyed or both by flood, fire, earthquake, or other catastrophe, upon the unanimous vote of its board, a district may do any or all of the following:

(a) Borrow money at a rate of interest not exceeding 8 percent a year, including borrowing from the United States or any of its agencies, in a principal amount not to exceed 6 percent of the assessed value of all real and personal property situated in the district.

(b) Issue evidences of indebtedness to represent the sum borrowed.

(c) Arrange terms for the repayment of the sum borrowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

16577.

A district may refinance any indebtedness incurred pursuant to Section 16576 by borrowing from the United States or any of its agencies and issuing in connection therewith evidences of indebtedness in the form and upon the terms required by the United States or its agency. The sum so borrowed shall not exceed the amount of the obligation being refinanced, and interest shall not exceed 8 percent per year. The money so borrowed for refinancing shall be used only to repay the obligation for the retirement of which the money was borrowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

16578.

A district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this division requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions or loans from the United States, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, for the purpose of financing the construction, maintenance, and operation of any enterprise in which the district is authorized to engage, and may enter into contracts and co-operate with, and accept co-operation from, the United States, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, in the construction, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the construction, maintenance, and operation, of any such enterprise in accordance with any legislation which Congress may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and co-operation may be furnished by the United States in the construction, maintenance, and operation or in financing the construction, maintenance, and operation of any such enterprise. A district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and co-operation under any federal legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 543.)
-------------------------------------------

16580.

A district may contract with any state agency to finance any district improvement authorized by Section 16461 that is related to the provision of water for human consumption. The terms of the contract shall be consistent with this chapter. Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, the term of the contract may extend up to 30 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 606, Sec. 7.   Effective October 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Receipts, Accounts, and Audits [16601. - 16614.]

16601.

Receipts from the operation of a public utility shall be paid daily into the treasury of the district in a special fund set aside for such public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16602.

The board may from time to time make appropriations from individual public utility funds for the following purposes:

(a) The payment of operating expenses of the public utility and all or such portion of the general salary and expense fund of the district as the board determines is justly apportionable thereto.

(b) Repairs and reconstruction.

(c) Payment of interest and sinking fund on the bonds or indebtedness incurred or assumed for acquisition, construction, or completion of the public utility. 

(d) Extensions and improvements.

(e) A reserve fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16603.

Whenever a reserve fund exceeds one-half of the payment for operating expenses in the preceding fiscal year, the board may appropriate such excess to the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16604.

The books of account of the district shall show all of the following:

(a) The true and complete financial results of the ownership and operation of each public utility.

(b) The actual cost of each public utility.

(c) All costs of maintenance, extension, and improvement, and all operating expenses of every description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16605.

The accounts of the district shall be examined at least once a year by an expert accountant, who shall report to the directors the result of his examination. He shall be employed and selected in such manner as the board directs, and shall receive for his services such compensation as the board prescribes, to be paid out of the income or revenues of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16606.

Every two years the board may, and upon petition of 15 percent of the electors of the district shall, employ a qualified expert who shall with all due diligence examine and report upon the following:

(a) The system of accounts kept by the district.

(b) All the contracts made and entered into by the board within the two years immediately preceding.

(c) The management of the utilities of the district, their operation, the service furnished, and the rates charged by the district.

(d) The properties and investments of the district.

(e) All official acts of the board relating to acquisition, construction, completion, extension, improvement, and betterment of the public utilities of the district.

(f) The efficiency and adequacy of each public utility, and of the property used in connection with it or with its operation, the reasonableness of the service and commodities furnished, and of the rates and charges therefor.

(g) All the business and affairs of the district relating to the ownership, management, and operation of each public utility of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16607.

The expense of employing an expert shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) at any one time, to be paid out of the income and revenues of the district, as the board prescribes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

16608.

Experts shall be selected by the Public Utilities Commission, and their names and addresses certified to the board of directors of the district. Several experts may be so selected and certified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16609.

Whenever an expert is to be employed pursuant to Section 16606, at least four months before each biennial district election the board shall request in writing the Public Utilities Commission to select and certify experts. The commission shall transmit the names of experts to the board making the request within two weeks after receipt of the request by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16610.

Within 10 days after receipt of a certification the board shall by resolution entered on its minutes employ the expert, or one of the experts selected and certified, fix the amount of his compensation either absolutely or on a per diem basis, and notify the expert of his appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16611.

In his report the expert shall make such recommendations and suggestions as to him seem proper and required for the good of the district, the efficient and economical or advantageous management and operation of the public utility of the district, and the business and affairs of the district relating to such management and operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16612.

In his report the expert shall make such recommendations and suggestions as to:

(a) The system of accounts kept, or in his judgment to be kept in connection with each public utility.

(b) The classification of the public utilities of the district and the establishment of a system of accounts for each class.

(c) The manner in which such accounts shall be kept.

(d) The forms of accounts, records, and memoranda kept or to be kept, including accounts, records, and memoranda of receipts and expenditures of money, and depreciation and sinking fund accounts, as in his judgment are proper and necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16613.

The expert shall enter upon his duties at least 90 days before the next impending biennial district election, and shall complete his examination and file his report at least 30 days before the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16614.

The expert’s report shall be made in duplicate to the electors of the district. One copy shall be filed with the board in the office of the clerk of the district, and one copy shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the district, or the greater part of its population, is situated. The county recorder shall record, index, and keep the report as a public record in his office, and shall make no charge for such recording.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Taxation [16641. - 16660.]

16641.

A district may levy and collect, or cause to be levied and collected, taxes for the purpose of carrying on its operations and paying its obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16641.5.

A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

16642.

Farm products and crops which are stored within the exterior boundaries of the district are not subject to taxation by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16643.

The board shall annually levy and collect a tax sufficient (a) to pay the annual interest on bonds, (b) to pay such part of the principal as will fall due within the succeeding year, and (c) to provide for the sinking fund payments of the next succeeding fiscal year.

When the interest and sinking fund payments for any fiscal year on bonds issued for a public utility or public utility works can be met out of the surplus earnings of such public utility, or out of moneys in the general fund of the district theretofore appropriated and transferred to the sinking fund of the public utility, no tax shall be levied for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16644.

If from any cause the revenues of a district are inadequate to pay the principal or interest on any bonded debt as it becomes due, the board shall, or if funds are needed to carry out the objects and purposes of the district which cannot be provided out of the revenues of the district the board may, levy a tax for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16645.

The board shall state the purposes for which taxes are necessary, and shall fix by ordinance the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16646.

By ordinance, the provisions of which conform to general law, the board may provide the manner of assessing and of correcting and equalizing assessments upon the taxable property situated within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16647.

The board may provide for the collection of delinquent taxes, penalties, interest, and costs by actions or legal proceedings brought, prosecuted, and maintained in the name of the district against the several owners of property from whom taxes are due and delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16648.

The board may elect to avail itself of the assessments made by the assessors of the counties in which the district is situated, and may take such assessments as the basis for district taxation. It shall declare its election by ordinance and file a certified copy of the ordinance with the auditors of the counties in which the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16649.

An election pursuant to Section 16648 is effective with respect to all taxes levied and assessed after February 1 next succeeding the date upon which the certified copy is filed. Thereafter all assessments shall be made and taxes collected by the assessors or tax collectors of the counties in which the district is situated until the board by ordinance elects otherwise. When the board elects otherwise, a certified copy of such ordinance shall be filed with the auditors of the counties in which the district is situated and it is effective with respect to all taxes levied and assessed after February 1st next succeeding the date upon which the certified copy is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16650.

Upon receipt of the certified copy filed pursuant to Section 16648 the county auditors shall, on or before the second Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district, ascertained from the assessment book of the counties for that year as equalized and corrected by the boards of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16651.
